Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 45 Wyoming Main Street Program

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 101, §§ 5, 6,
7, states:

“

Section 5

. (a) It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i)

All duties of the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program be transferred to the Wyoming business council. Effective July 1, 2007, all duties of the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program not assumed by the Wyoming business council are terminated;

“(ii)

Any contract agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the department of agriculture, be assumed by the Wyoming business council;

“(iii)

Any rule adopted by the department of agriculture with respect to the Wyoming main street program remain in effect unaltered as rule of the Wyoming business council until amended or repealed by the Wyoming business council.

“

Section 6

. There is transferred from the department of agriculture to the Wyoming business council any appropriated or unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, exclusively dedicated to the Wyoming main street program.

“

Section 7

. There is transferred one (1) full-time equivalent position and one (1) part-time equivalent position from the department of agriculture to the Wyoming business council for the purposes of administering the Wyoming main street program.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 2, appropriates $350,000, or as much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the department of agriculture for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, to implement the purposes of the act. Of this appropriation, not more than $50,000 may be expended for contract services under W.S. 9-12-804(b)(i) and $300,000 is to be allocated for facade design and renovation of main street storefronts. The act authorizes the department of agriculture one full-time equivalent position and one part-time equivalent position for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, to implement the provisions of the act. Of the general fund appropriation to the Wyoming business council contained in Laws 2004, ch. 95, $200,000 appropriated for the main street program is to be transferred to the department of agriculture and expended only for the purpose of the main street program.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 119, § 3, makes this act effective July 1, 2004.